Nebraska, session 109, LB1120.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1120 LB1120
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 9-401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-401 Sections 9-401 to 9-437 and section 4 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act.
Sec. 2. Section 9-411, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-411 (1) Lottery shall mean a gambling scheme in which (a)
participants pay or agree to pay something of value for an opportunity to
win, (b) winning opportunities are represented by tickets differentiated
by sequential enumeration, and (c) winners are determined by a random
drawing of the tickets or by the method set forth in section 9-426.01 or
section 4 of this act.
(2) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, lottery Lottery
shall not include (a) any raffle as defined in section 9-415, (b) any
gambling scheme which uses any mechanical, computer, electronic, or video
gaming device which has the capability of awarding something of value,
free games redeemable for something of value, or tickets or stubs
redeemable for something of value, (c) any activity which is authorized
or regulated under the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City
Lottery Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small
Lottery and Raffle Act, the State Lottery Act, section 9-701, or Chapter
2, article 12, or (d) any activity which is prohibited under Chapter 28,
article 11.
Sec. 3. Section 9-415, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-415 (1) Raffle shall mean a gambling scheme in which (a)
participants pay or agree to pay something of value for an opportunity to
win, (b) winning opportunities are represented by tickets differentiated
by sequential enumeration, (c) winners are determined by a random drawing
of the tickets or by the method set forth in section 9-426.01 or section
4 of this act, and (d) at least eighty percent of all of the prizes to be
-2-

LB1120 LB1120
2026 2026
awarded are merchandise prizes which are not directly or indirectly
redeemable for cash by the licensed organization conducting the raffle or
any agent of the organization.
(2) Except as provided in section 4 of this act, raffle Raffle shall
not include (a) any gambling scheme which uses any mechanical, computer,
electronic, or video gaming device which has the capability of awarding
something of value, free games redeemable for something of value, or
tickets or stubs redeemable for something of value, (b) any activity
which is authorized or regulated under the Nebraska Bingo Act, the
Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery
Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, the State Lottery Act,
section 9-701, or Chapter 2, article 12, or (c) activity which is
prohibited under Chapter 28, article 11.
Sec. 4. (1) A licensed organization may conduct a lottery or raffle
that includes a progressive jackpot and multiple drawing dates for a game
such as, but not limited to, the Queen of Hearts. In order to conduct a
lottery or raffle in the method described in this section, such licensee
shall (a) register each such lottery or raffle game with the department
and (b) post the rules for such lottery or raffle in a visible location
where such lottery or raffle is conducted or where tickets for such
lottery or raffle are sold.
(2) A licensed organization may sell a ticket for a lottery or
raffle conducted pursuant to this section through a vending or dispensing
device.
(3) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
for the conduct of a lottery or raffle utilizing the method authorized
pursuant to this section.
Sec. 5. Section 9-427, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
9-427 (1) The gross proceeds of any lottery or raffle shall be used
solely for lawful purposes, awarding of prizes, and allowable expenses.
-3-

LB1120 LB1120
2026 2026
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, not Not
less than sixty-five percent of the gross proceeds of any lottery or
raffle shall be used for the awarding of prizes, and not more than ten
percent of the gross proceeds of a lottery or raffle shall be used to pay
the allowable expenses of operating such scheme, except that if prizes
are donated to the licensed organization to be awarded in connection with
a raffle, the prizes awarded shall have a fair market value equal to at
least sixty-five percent of the gross proceeds of the raffle and the
licensed organization shall use the proceeds for allowable expenses,
optional additional prizes, and a lawful purpose.
(3) A lottery or raffle conducted pursuant to section 4 of this act
shall only require fifty percent of the gross proceeds of such lottery or
raffle to be used for awarding of prizes.
Sec. 6. Section 9-431, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-431 Each licensed organization conducting a lottery or raffle
conducted pursuant to the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act shall have its
name and identification number clearly printed on each lottery or raffle
ticket or stub used in such lottery or raffle. No such ticket or stub
shall be sold unless such name and identification number is so printed
thereon. In addition, all lottery or raffle tickets or stubs shall bear a
number, which numbers shall be in sequence and clearly printed on the
ticket or stub.
Except as provided for a lottery or raffle conducted pursuant to
section 4 of this act, each Each ticket or stub shall have an equal
chance of being chosen in the drawing. Each ticket or stub shall be
constructed of the same material, shall have the same surface, and shall
be substantially the same shape, size, form and weight.
Each licensed organization conducting a lottery or raffle shall keep
a record of all locations where its tickets or stubs are sold. In
addition to other authorized sales, a licensed organization conducting a
-4-

LB1120 LB1120
2026 2026
raffle conducted pursuant to the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act may also
sell tickets or stubs for such raffles on its website and at events, and
such tickets or stubs may be purchased using a debit card online on the
website and at events in addition to other authorized methods of payment.
Sec. 7. Section 9-501, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-501 Sections 9-501 to 9-513 and section 10 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act.
Sec. 8. Section 9-507, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-507 (1) Lottery shall mean a gambling scheme in which (a)
participants pay or agree to pay something of value for an opportunity to
win, (b) winning opportunities are represented by tickets differentiated
by sequential enumeration, (c) the winners are to be determined by a
random drawing of the tickets or by the method set forth in section
9-511.01 or section 10 of this act, and (d) the holders of the winning
tickets are to receive something of value.
(2) Except as provided in section 10 of this act, lottery Lottery
shall not include (a) any raffle, (b) any gambling scheme which uses any
mechanical, computer, electronic, or video gaming device which has the
capability of awarding something of value, free games redeemable for
something of value, or tickets or stubs redeemable for something of
value, (c) any activity authorized or regulated under the Nebraska Bingo
Act, the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and
Raffle Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the State Lottery Act,
section 9-701, or Chapter 2, article 12, or (d) any activity prohibited
under Chapter 28, article 11.
Sec. 9. Section 9-509, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
9-509 (1) Raffle shall mean a gambling scheme in which (a)
participants pay or agree to pay something of value for an opportunity to
-5-

LB1120 LB1120
2026 2026
win, (b) winning opportunities are represented by tickets differentiated
by sequential enumeration, (c) winners are to be determined by a random
drawing of tickets or by the method set forth in section 9-511.01 or
section 10 of this act, and (d) at least eighty percent of all of the
prizes to be awarded are merchandise prizes which are not directly or
indirectly redeemable for cash by the qualifying nonprofit organization
conducting the raffle or any agent of the organization.
(2) Except as provided in section 10 of this act, raffle Raffle
shall not include (a) any gambling scheme which uses any mechanical,
computer, electronic, or video gaming device which has the capability of
awarding something of value, free games redeemable for something of
value, or tickets or stubs redeemable for something of value, (b) any
activity authorized or regulated under the Nebraska Bingo Act, the
Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle
Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the State Lottery Act, section
9-701, or Chapter 2, article 12, or (c) any activity prohibited under
Chapter 28, article 11.
Sec. 10. (1) A qualifying nonprofit organization may conduct a
lottery or raffle that includes a progressive jackpot and multiple
drawing dates for a game such as, but not limited to, the Queen of
Hearts. In order to conduct a lottery or raffle in the method described
in this section, such organization shall (a) register each such lottery
or raffle game with the department and (b) post the rules for such
lottery or raffle in a visible location where such lottery or raffle is
conducted or where tickets for such lottery or raffle are sold.
(2) A qualifying nonprofit organization may sell a ticket for a
lottery or raffle conducted pursuant to this section through a vending or
dispensing device.
(3) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
for the conduct of a lottery or raffle utilizing the method authorized
pursuant to this section.
-6-

LB1120 LB1120
2026 2026
Sec. 11. Section 9-511, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-511 Any qualifying nonprofit organization may conduct a lottery or
raffle that has gross proceeds not greater than fifteen thousand dollars.
Except as provided for a lottery or raffle conducted pursuant to section
10 of this act, each Each chance in such lottery or raffle shall have an
equal likelihood of being a winning chance. The gross proceeds shall be
used solely for charitable or community betterment purposes, awarding of
prizes, and expenses. Any qualifying nonprofit organization may conduct
one lottery per calendar month that has gross proceeds not greater than
fifteen thousand dollars. Any qualifying nonprofit organization may
conduct one or more raffles in a calendar month if the total gross
proceeds from such raffles do not exceed fifteen thousand dollars during
such month.
Sec. 12. Original sections 9-401, 9-411, 9-415, 9-431, 9-501,
9-507, and 9-509, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections
9-427 and 9-511, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-7-